src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
stipendi:stipendi n5_troppi_odd ;
pypliikki:pypliikki n5_troppi_odd ;
varokki:varokki n5_troppi_odd ;
yllykki:yllykki n5_troppi_odd ;
piironki:piironki n5_troppi_odd ;
klaffipiironki:klaffi#piironki n5_troppi_odd ;
kaapeli:kaapeli n5_troppi_odd ;
kapaapeli:kapaapeli n5_troppi_odd ;
saapeli:saapeli n5_troppi_odd ;
koopeli:koopeli n5_troppi_odd ;
temppeli:temppeli n5_troppi_odd ;
pimppeli:pimppeli n5_troppi_odd ;
tämppeli:tämppeli n5_troppi_odd ;
koppeli:koppeli n5_troppi_odd ;
juupeli:juupeli n5_troppi_odd ;
kyöpeli:kyöpeli n5_troppi_odd ;
kööpeli:kööpeli n5_troppi_odd ;
mööpeli:mööpeli n5_troppi_odd ;
naimamööpeli:naima#mööpeli n5_troppi_odd ;
kontrolli:kontrolli n5_troppi_odd ;
syli:syli n5_troppi_odd ;
puusyli:puu#syli n5_troppi_odd ;
prupleemi:prupleemi n5_troppi_odd ;
prupleemi:prupleemi n5_troppi_odd ;
systeemi:systeemi n5_troppi_odd ;
pannusysteemi:pannu#systeemi n5_troppi_odd ;
kumppani:kumppani n5_troppi_odd ;
matkakumppani:matka#kumppani n5_troppi_odd ;
vellikumppani:velli#kumppani n5_troppi_odd ;
kasvinkumppani:kasvin#kumppani n5_troppi_odd ;
piippukumppani:piippu#kumppani n5_troppi_odd ;
hormooni:hormooni n5_troppi_odd ;
kamari:kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
karjanviljakamari:karjanvilja#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
viinakamari:viina#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
kolpakamari:kolpa#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
vaatekamari:vaate#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
fiilikamari:fiili#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
luhtikamari:luhti#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
porstuankamari:porstuan#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
tallinkamari:tallin#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
maitokamari:maito#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
makkuukamari:makkuu#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
porstuamperäkamari:porstuamperä#kamari n5_troppi_odd ;
alttari:alttari n5_troppi_odd ;
pilleri:pilleri n5_troppi_odd ;
p-pilleri:p-pilleri n5_troppi_odd ;
akyytti-p-pilleri:akyytti-p-pilleri n5_troppi_odd ;
Kyriiri:Kyriiri n5_troppi_odd ;
traktori:traktori n5_troppi_odd ;
epa-traktori:epa-traktori n5_troppi_odd ;
kulttuuri:kulttuuri n5_troppi_odd ; 
kivääri:kivääri n5_troppi_odd ;
resyrsi:resyrsi n5_troppi_odd ;
stipenti:stipent2i n5_troppi_odd ;
jyristi:jyristi n5_troppi_odd ;
tyristi:tyristi n5_troppi_odd ;
nasisti:nasisti n5_troppi_odd ;
projekti:projekti n5_troppi_odd ;
prujekti:prujekti n5_troppi_odd ;
sapatti:sapatti n5_troppi_odd ;
koopisti:koopisti n5_troppi_odd ;
sihteeri:sihteeri n5_troppi_odd ;
seeläntari:seeläntari n5_troppi_odd ;
sörspääri:sörspääri n5_troppi_odd ;
safööri:safööri n5_troppi_odd ;
sulisti:sulisti n5_troppi_odd ;
separaaturi:separaaturi n5_troppi_odd ;
santeli:santeli n5_troppi_odd ;
syffeli:syffeli n5_troppi_odd ;
sjyffeli:sjyffeli n5_troppi_odd ;
sekunti:sekunti n5_troppi_odd ;
spetsisärvetti:spetsi#särvetti n5_troppi_odd ;
slahtari:slahtari n5_troppi_odd ;
sinimanteli:sinimanteli n5_troppi_odd ;
snikkari:snikkari n5_troppi_odd ;
synoodi:synoodi n5_troppi_odd ;
synooti:synooti n5_troppi_odd ;
synnytyskontrolli:synnytys#kontrolli n5_troppi_odd ;
suosikki:suosikki n5_troppi_odd ;
sotilasparakki:sotilas#parakki n5_troppi_odd ;
salonkikivääri:salonki#kivääri n5_troppi_odd ;
stytsari:stytsari n5_troppi_odd ;
styyrmanni:styyrmanni n5_troppi_odd ;
stantarti:stantarti n5_troppi_odd ;
säsonki:säsonki n5_troppi_odd ;
symtoomi:symtoomi n5_troppi_odd ;
skriivari:skriivari n5_troppi_odd ;
sahtplantari:sahtplantari n5_troppi_odd ;
silhetti:silhetti n5_troppi_odd ;
sponsori:sponsori n5_troppi_odd ;
sesongi:sesongi n5_troppi_odd ;
sjäslongi:sjäslongi n5_troppi_odd ;
säslongi:säslongi n5_troppi_odd ;
jirlangi:jirlangi n5_troppi_odd ;
jazzimysiikki:jazzi#mysiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
jassimysiikki:jassi#mysiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
gratängi:gratängi n5_troppi_odd ;
gonggongi:gonggongi n5_troppi_odd ;
garderoobi:garderoobi n5_troppi_odd ;
härkoorti:härkoorti n5_troppi_odd ;
hantyyki:hantyyki n5_troppi_odd ;
humpuuki:humpuuki n5_troppi_odd ;
hakkuri:hakkuri n5_troppi_odd ;
hintyyvi:hintyyvi n5_troppi_odd ;
halsmanteli:halsmanteli n5_troppi_odd ;
heilavarvari:heilavarvari n5_troppi_odd ;
halstuuki:halstuuki n5_troppi_odd ;
hallikki:hallikki n5_troppi_odd ;
hybriidi:hybriidi n5_troppi_odd ;
hypriiti:hypriiti n5_troppi_odd ;
hautajaismusiikki:hautajais#musiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
musliimi:musliimi n5_troppi_odd ;
mysiikki:mysiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
matematiikki:matematiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
mupeeti:mupeeti n5_troppi_odd ; 
mupeedi:mupeedi n5_troppi_odd ;
mupeti:mupeti n5_troppi_odd ;
mokkari:mokkari n5_troppi_odd ;
markongi:markongi n5_troppi_odd ;
moolekki:moolekki n5_troppi_odd ;
marängi:marängi n5_troppi_odd ;
mylvaadi:mylvaadi n5_troppi_odd ;
mylvaati:mylvaati n5_troppi_odd ;
mimiikki:mimiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
mettäbarakki:mettä#barakki n5_troppi_odd ;
isuleerinki:isuleerinki n5_troppi_odd ;
instrymänttimusiikki:instrymänttimusiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
fänrikki:fänrikki n5_troppi_odd ;
fysiikki:fysiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
falangi:falangi n5_troppi_odd ;
optiikki:optiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
orvokki:orvokki n5_troppi_odd ;
omslaaki:omslaak2i n5_troppi_odd ;
samlaaki:samlaak2i n5_troppi_odd ;
omgongi:omgongi n5_troppi_odd ;
omkongi:omkongi n5_troppi_odd ;
alkkuhoolikliniikki:alkkuhooli#kliniikki n5_troppi_odd ;
antiikki:antiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
kokkointumismusiikki:kokkointumis#musiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
kusakki:kusakki n5_troppi_odd ;
kypongi:kypongi n5_troppi_odd ;
kratängi:kratängi n5_troppi_odd ;
äpyli:äpyli n5_troppi_odd ;
äksaami:äksaami n5_troppi_odd ;
äpylisillisalaatti:äpylisillisalaatti n5_troppi_odd ;
äkstokki:äkstokki n5_troppi_odd ;
pantiitti:pantiitti n5_troppi_odd ;
tortyyri:tortyyri n5_troppi_odd ;
pumpulisutti:pumpulisutti n5_troppi_odd ;
paletti:paletti n5_troppi_odd ;
prufeetti:prufeetti n5_troppi_odd ;
puukmerkki:puukmerkki n5_troppi_odd ;
palkongi:palkongi n5_troppi_odd ;
paniikki:paniikki n5_troppi_odd ;
pingpongi:pingpongi n5_troppi_odd ;
pasteiji:pasteiji n5_troppi_odd ;
pooläkki:pooläkki n5_troppi_odd ;
polikliniikki:poli#kliniikki n5_troppi_odd ;
paperifapriikki:paperi#fapriikki n5_troppi_odd ;
plastiikki:plastiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
patongi:patongi n5_troppi_odd ;
pysäkki:pysäkki n5_troppi_odd ;
Pikpängi:Pikpängi n5_troppi_odd ;
peryykki:peryykki n5_troppi_odd ;
palongi:palongi n5_troppi_odd ;
preesensi:preesensi n5_troppi_odd ;
preesenssi:preesenssi n5_troppi_odd ;
palaati:palaati n5_troppi_odd ;
pykinkontrolli:pykin#kontrolli n5_troppi_odd ;
poppimysiikki:poppi#mysiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
pärongi:pärongi n5_troppi_odd ;
puljongi:puljongi n5_troppi_odd ;
pyljongi:pyljongi n5_troppi_odd ;
pallutalangi:pallutalangi n5_troppi_odd ;
pallotalangi:pallotalangi n5_troppi_odd ;
puängi:puängi n5_troppi_odd ;
lokiikki:lokiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
lyriikki:lyriikki n5_troppi_odd ;
lankongi:lankongi n5_troppi_odd ;
lavemangi:lavemangi n5_troppi_odd ;
lekenti+Err/Orth:lekendi n5_troppi_odd ;
lekenti:lekenti n5_troppi_odd ;
legendi:legendi n5_troppi_odd ;
lyftjevääri:lyft#jevääri n5_troppi_odd ;
lanstingi:lanstingi n5_troppi_odd ;
reliikki:reliikki n5_troppi_odd ;
rokkimysiikki:rokki#mysiikki n5_troppi_odd ;
rynkongi:rynkongi n5_troppi_odd ;
rybriikki:rybriikki n5_troppi_odd ;
repliikki:repliikki n5_troppi_odd ;
biidraagi:biidraagi n5_troppi_odd ;
piitraaki:piitraaki n5_troppi_odd ;
basaari:basaari n5_troppi_odd ;
basängi:basängi n5_troppi_odd ;
batongi:batongi n5_troppi_odd ;
balkongi:balkongi n5_troppi_odd ;
balaadi:balaadi n5_troppi_odd ;
vaimokliniikki:vaimo#kliniikki n5_troppi_odd ;
villafapriikki:villa#fapriikki n5_troppi_odd ;
klisteri:klisteri n5_troppi_odd ;
klosetti:klosetti n5_troppi_odd ;
kartongi:kartongi n5_troppi_odd ;
kukongi:kukongi n5_troppi_odd ;
kalapaliikki:kala#paliikki n5_troppi_odd ;
kliniikki:kliniikki n5_troppi_odd ;
kavai:kavai n5_troppi_odd ;
kavaiji:kavaiji n5_troppi_odd ;
kumakki:kumakki n5_troppi_odd ;
kuliikki:kuliikki n5_troppi_odd ;
kypongi:kypongi n5_troppi_odd ;
karaffi:karaffi n5_troppi_odd ;
tampongi:tampongi n5_troppi_odd ;
tupakki:tupakki n5_troppi_odd ;
trafiikkikontrolli:trafiikki#kontrolli n5_troppi_odd ;
episuudi:episuudi n5_troppi_odd;
epookki:epookki n5_troppi_odd ;
episuuti:episuuti n5_troppi_odd ;
konteksti:konteksti n5_troppi_odd ;
